Utah statutes.
53A-6-108.    Prohibition on use of degrees or credit from unapproved institutions.

(1)  An individual may not use a postsecondary degree or credit awarded by a postsecondary institution or program to gain a license, employment, or any other benefit within the public school system unless the institution or program was, at the time the degree or credit was awarded:

(a)  approved for the granting of the degree or credit by the board; or

(b)  accredited by an accrediting organization recognized by the board.

(2)  The board may grant an exemption from Subsection (1) to an individual who shows good cause for the granting of the exemption.



Repealed and Re-enacted by Chapter 108, 1999 General Session

